Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-619
Governor; selection of running mate; when.

Any candidate for the office of Governor circulating petitions or having petitions circulated in his or her behalf after the primary election and prior to the general election shall, prior to the circulation of such petitions, select the person whom he or she wishes to be his or her Lieutenant Governor for ballot purposes and have such person's name placed on the petitions. The written consent required under section 32-619.01 of the Lieutenant Governor candidate shall be submitted when the petitions are submitted for verification.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 187;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 63;

Laws 2001, LB 768, § 3.